zh-TW: 正時鏈排數: 雙排; 單排; 三排; 其他
ru: Количество рядов цепи ГРМ: Двухрядная; Однорядная; Трехрядная; Другое
bg-BG: Брой редове на ангренажната верига: Двуредова; Едноредова; Триредова; Друго
sv: Antal kamkedjerader: Dubbelradig; Enkelradig; Treradig; Övrigt
nb: Antall rader i registerkjedet: Dobbel rad; Enkel rad; Trippel rad; Annet
lt-LT: Paskirstymo grandinės eilių skaičius: Dviejų eilių; Vienos eilės; Trijų eilių; Kita
pt-PT: Número de filas da corrente de distribuição: Fila dupla; Fila única; Fila tripla; Outro
fr: Nombre de rangées de chaîne de distribution: Double rangée; Simple rangée; Triple rangée; Autre
ko: 타이밍 체인 열 수: 복열; 단열; 3열; 기타
tr: Zamanlama zinciri sıra sayısı: Çift sıralı; Tek sıralı; Üç sıralı; Diğer
zh-CN: 正时链条排数: 双排; 单排; 三排; 其他
en: Number of timing chain rows: Double-row; Single-row; Triple-row; Other
vi: Số hàng xích cam: Hai dãy; Một dãy; Ba dãy; Khác
pt-BR: Fileiras da corrente de distribuição número: Fileira dupla; Fileira única; Fileira tripla; Outro
de: Anzahl der Steuerkettenreihen: Zweireihig; Einreihig; Dreireihig; Andere
nl: Aantal distributiekettingrijen: Dubbele rij; Enkele rij; Driedubbele rij; Overig
ro-RO: Numărul de rânduri ale lanțului de distribuție: Pe două rânduri; Pe un rând; Pe trei rânduri; Altele
hu: Vezérműlánc sorainak száma: Kétsoros; Egysoros; Háromsoros; Egyéb
hr-HR: Broj redova lanaca razvodnog mehanizma: Dvoredni; Jednoredni; Troredni; Ostalo
el: Αριθμός σειρών αλυσίδας χρονισμού: Διπλή σειρά; Μονή σειρά; Τριπλή σειρά; Άλλο
cs: Počet řad rozvodového řetězu: Dvouřadý; Jednořadý; Třířadý; Ostatní
sk-SK: Počet radov rozvodovej reťaze: Dvojradová; Jednoradová; Trojradová; Iné
da: Antal rækker i timingkæde: Dobbeltradet; Enkeltradet; Treradet; Andet
th: จำนวนแถวของโซ่ราวลิ้น: แถวคู่; แถวเดี่ยว; สามแถว; อื่นๆ
es: Cantidad de filas de la cadena de distribución: Doble fila; Fila única; Triple fila; Otro
sl-SI: Število vrst pogonske verige: Dvoredna; Enoredna; Troredna; Drugo
it: Numero di file della catena di distribuzione: Doppia fila; Fila singola; Tripla fila; Altro
fi: Jakoketjun rivien lukumäärä: Kaksirivinen; Yksirivinen; Kolmirivinen; Muu
pl: Liczba rzędów łańcucha rozrządu: Dwurzędowy; Jednorzędowy; Trzyrzędowy; Inne
ja: タイミングチェーンの行数: 2列; 1列; 3列; その他